West Virginia, session 2026, HB4262.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 8. Authorization for Department of transportation to promulgate legislative rules. §64-8-1. Division of Motor Vehicles. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §17A-2-9 of this code, relating to the Division of Motor Vehicles (motor vehicle equipment, 91 CSR 11), is authorized.